District of Columbia statutes.
23-525

Disposition of property.

A law enforcement officer or a designated civilian employee of the Metropolitan Police Department who seizes property in the execution of a search warrant shall cause it to be safely kept for use as evidence. No property seized shall be released or destroyed except in accordance with law and upon order of a court or of the United States attorney or Corporation Counsel for the District of Columbia [Attorney General for the District of Columbia] or one of their assistants.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-284, § 8(a), 46 DCR 1328
Disposition of drugs seized under Uniform Narcotic Drug Act, see § 48-902.08.
Drug Paraphernalia Act of 1982, property subject to forfeiture under Act, see § 48-1104.
Property Clerk of Metropolitan Police Department, powers and duties, see §§ 5-119.01 to 5-119.07.
1981 Ed., § 23-525.
1973 Ed., § 23-525.
Section 8(a) of D.C. Law 12-282 substituted “A law enforcement officer or a designated civilian employee of the Metropolitan Police Department” for “An officer or agent.”
Section 13(b) of D.C. Law 12-282 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 8(a) of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization and Street Solicitation for Prostitution Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-428, August 6, 1998, 45 DCR 5884).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 8(a) of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-506, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8139), and § 8(a) of the Metropolitan Police Department Civilianization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-13, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2333).